Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-807
Division; personnel; bond or insurance.

(1) Other than the director, all employees of the division shall be classified employees under the rules and regulations of the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(2) Before entering upon the duties of the office, the director and each employee of the division shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 7;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 343, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 7.